Hawaii, session 2025, GM1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the vigilance of
individual citizens can keep communities safe through the
reporting of witnessed criminal conduct to law enforcement.
However, the legislature also finds that in certain
circumstances, individuals have misused the ability to summon
law enforcement officers against persons of protected classes
without reason to suspect a crime is being committed.
The purpose of this Act is to give any person injured by
discriminatory reporting to a law enforcement officer recourse
through civil action.
SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows:
"CHAPTER
DISCRIMINATORY REPORTING TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
§ -1 Discriminatory reporting; law enforcement officer;
civil remedy. (a) Any person who knowingly causes a law
2025-2538 SB116 HDl HMSO 1
iMiMiiBiBiiiiinn

Page 2 S.B. NO.
enforcement officer to come to a location to contact a person on
the basis of the person's actual or perceived race, color,
ancestry, ethnicity, national origin, place of birth, sex, age,
religion, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity or
expression with the specific intent to:
(1) Infringe upon the person's rights under the Hawaii
State Constitution or United States Constitution;
(2) Discriminate against the person;
(3) Cause the person to feel harassed, humiliated, or
embarrassed;
(4) Cause the person to be expelled from a place that the
person is lawfully located;
(5) Damage the person's reputation or standing within the
community; or
(6) Damage the person's financial, economic, consumer, or
business prospects or interests,
shall be liable in a civil action or proceeding.
(b) Any person injured by a violation of subsection (a)
may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in
the State for injunctive relief; payment for damages, which may
include punitive damages; or other appropriate relief. If, in
2025-2538 SB116 HDl HMSO

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
the action, the court finds that the defendant is violating or
has violated subsection (a), the court shall enjoin the
defendant from a continuance thereof. It shall not be necessary
that actual damages to the plaintiff be alleged or proved in
order to obtain the injunction.
(c) If the judgment is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff
shall be awarded damages of no less than $1,000 plus attorneys'
fees and costs.
§ -2 Guidance. The department of law enforcement, in
consultation with the Hawaii civil rights commission, shall
provide guidance to the public on the civil liability and
remedies available for discriminatory reporting to a law
enforcement officer pursuant to this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 368-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§368-1 Purpose and intent. The legislature finds and
declares that the practice of discrimination because of race,
color, religion, age, sex, including gender identity or
expression, sexual orientation, marital status, national origin,
place of birth, ancestry, or disability in employment, housing,
public accommodations, or access to services receiving state
2025-2538 SB116 HDl HMSO

Page 4
S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
financial assistance is against public policy. It is the
purpose of this chapter to provide a mechanism that provides for
a uniform procedure for the enforcement of the State's
discrimination laws. It is the legislature's intent to preserve
all existing rights and remedies under such laws."
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on September 1,
2025.
2025-2538 SB116 HDl HMSO

S.B. NO. g;
APPROVED this 1st day of July , 2025

S.B.No. 116, S.D. 2, H.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 21, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 116, SD 2, HD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives